District of Columbia statutes.
6-202

Establishment of District of Columbia Housing Authority; purposes of Authority; Fund.

(a)

There is established, as an independent authority of the District government, the District of Columbia Housing Authority. The Authority shall be a corporate body, intended, created, and empowered to effectuate the purposes stated in this chapter, and shall have a legal existence separate from the District government. The Authority shall be the successor in interest to the housing authority created by subchapter II of Chapter 2 of Title 6 [repealed]. All real and personal property, assets, records, and obligations, and all unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available relating to the powers, duties, functions, operations, and administration of the DPAH and of the authority created under subchapter II of Chapter 2 of Title 6 shall become the property of the Authority on May 9, 2000, without further action.

(b)

The Authority shall govern public housing and implement the Housing Act of 1937 in the District, and shall be responsible for providing decent, safe, and sanitary dwellings, and related facilities, for persons and families of low-and moderate-income in the District.

(c)

There is established the District of Columbia Housing Authority Fund, which shall be a proprietary fund in the nature of an enterprise fund as classified under § 47-373 and administered by the Authority in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. All revenues, rents, proceeds, and monies, from whatever source derived, that are collected or received by the Authority shall be credited to the Fund and shall not at any time be transferred to, lapse into, or be commingled with the General Fund of the District or any other fund or account of the District; provided, that funds may be paid out of the Fund to the District Treasurer to pay for goods, services, or property, or other things of value, if any, purchased by the Authority from the District.

(d)

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, or any other provision of this chapter, any funds provided to the Authority from the local revenues of the District shall be held separate and apart from the Fund and shall be held and expended for the use and benefit of the District for the purposes and uses provided in the approved budget and financial plan. The Authority shall expend, and account for the expenditure of, funds in the same manner as all other agencies of the District government. At the end of each fiscal year, the unexpended amount of such funds shall revert to the fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 3, 47 DCR 1325
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2022, 52 DCR 7503

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-201.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-33 added subsec. (d).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 6-201.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2022 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).

Short Title

Short title of subtitle C of title II of Law 16-33: Section 2021 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle C of title II of the act may be cited as the District Support for Public Housing Amendment Act of 2005.